Washington statutes.
RCW 15.62.140

Assessments—Minimum—Increase.

(1) The commission shall collect annual assessments as follows:

(a) Twenty-five cents for each colony operated by an apiarist or broker in Washington at any time in a calendar year. Each colony shall be assessed only once per calendar year. There shall be a minimum assessment of ten dollars.

(b) The sale of a business enterprise by an apiarist or broker shall not be assessed.

The provisions of this subsection (1) are effective only if the referendum required by RCW 15.62.030 on the creation of the commission is adopted.

(2) Subject to approval by referendum, the commission shall have the power and duty to increase the amount of the assessments as necessary to fulfill the purposes of this chapter.

(3) In determining the necessity for an assessment increase, the commission shall consider:

(a) The purpose of the commission;

(b) The extent and probable cost of required research, promotion, and advertising;

(c) The extent of public convenience, interest, and necessity; and

(d) The expected revenue from the increased assessment.

(4) The increase in assessment shall not become effective until approved by a majority of the affected persons voting in a referendum conducted by the commission. The referendum must be approved by:

(a) Either fifty-one percent of the apiarists and brokers representing sixty-six percent of the colonies registered in Washington in the twelve months preceding voting; or

(b) Sixty-six percent of the apiarists and brokers representing fifty-one percent of the colonies registered in Washington in the twelve months preceding voting; and

(c) Either fifty-one percent of manufacturers, processors, and first handlers representing sixty-six percent of industry products sold in Washington by its residents; or

(d) Sixty-six percent of manufacturers, processors, and first handlers representing fifty-one percent of industry products sold in Washington by its residents.

[ 1989 c 5 s 14.]